New Jersey, session 222, A3035.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: "Long-term care facility" means a nursing home, assisted living residence, comprehensive personal care home, residential health care facility, or dementia care home licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b. Consistent with federal and State privacy laws, a long-term care facility shall meet, at a minimum, once annually with each resident and the residents family to discuss and review the emergency contact information for the resident on file with the long-term care facility. c.     Consistent with federal and State privacy laws, and in addition to the meeting required pursuant to subsection b. of this section with the residents family, a long-term care facility shall offer each resident the opportunity to update the residents emergency contact information with the long-term care facility, at a minimum, twice annually. d.    For the purposes of this section, emergency contact information shall include a primary and a secondary contact. e.     The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit a long-term care facility from sharing information regarding a resident to an individual not on file as an emergency contact. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.